Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-810
Damages.

A buyer injured by a violation of the Credit Services Organization Act may bring an action for recovery of damages. The damages awarded shall not be less than the amount paid by the buyer to the credit services organization plus reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.

Laws 1991, LB 292, § 10.